Maine, session 132, LD1270.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 2 MRSA §6, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. Y, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Range 91. The salaries of the following state officials and employees are within
salary range 91:
Commissioner of Transportation;
Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry;
Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services;
Commissioner of Education;
Commissioner of Environmental Protection;
Executive Director of Dirigo Health;
Commissioner of Public Safety;
Commissioner of Professional and Financial Regulation;
Commissioner of Labor;
Commissioner of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife;
Commissioner of Marine Resources;
Commissioner of Corrections;
Commissioner of Economic and Community Development;
Commissioner of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management; and
Executive Director, Workers' Compensation Board.; and
Commissioner of Energy Resources.
Page 1 - 132LR1752(05)

Sec. A-2. 2 MRSA §6, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt. XXX, §2, is
further amended to read:
4. Range 88. The salaries of the following state officials and employees are within
salary range 88:
Director, Bureau of Air Quality;
Director, Bureau of Water Quality;
Director, Bureau of Land Resources;
Director, Bureau of Remediation and Waste Management;
Deputy Commissioner, Environmental Protection; and
Deputy Chief of the State Police.; and
Deputy Commissioner, Energy Resources.
Sec. A-3. 2 MRSA §9, as amended by PL 2025, c. 293, §1, is repealed.
Sec. A-4. 5 MRSA §960 is enacted to read:
§960. Department of Energy Resources
The position of Deputy Commissioner is a major policy-influencing position within
the Department of Energy Resources. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, this position and any successor position is subject to this chapter.
Sec. A-5. 5 MRSA §15302, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt. D, §10, is
further amended to read:
3. Board of Directors of the Maine Technology Institute. The institute is governed
and all of its powers are exercised by a board of directors, referred to in this chapter as the
"board," consisting of 13 voting members and 2 3 nonvoting members.
A. The Governor shall appoint 10 voting directors, 8 of whom must be representatives
of targeted technologies. The other 2 directors must have demonstrated significant
experience in finance, lending or venture capital. In making the appointments from
targeted technologies, the Governor shall consider recommendations submitted by
representatives of targeted technology sectors. Directors of the board appointed by the
Governor are entitled to receive reimbursement at the legislative rate for necessary
expenses for their attendance at authorized meetings of the board.
B. The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development or the
commissioner's designee, the President of the Maine Community College System or
the president's designee and the Chancellor of the University of Maine System or the
chancellor's designee are ex officio voting directors.
C. The Director of the Governor's Office of Policy Innovation and the Future or the
director's designee is an ex officio nonvoting director.
D. The Maine Technology Institute Director is a nonvoting director.
E. The Commissioner of Energy Resources or the commissioner's designee is an ex
officio nonvoting director.
Page 2 - 132LR1752(05)

Sec. A-6. 10 MRSA §965, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 417, §6, is
amended to read:
B. Two One of the at-large members must be knowledgeable in the field of natural
resource enterprises or financing.
Sec. A-7. 10 MRSA §965, sub-§3, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. One of the at-large members must be knowledgeable in the field of clean energy
finance or technology solutions for climate change.
Sec. A-8. 26 MRSA §1308, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 333, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Determination of wage and benefits rates. The Bureau of Labor Standards shall
investigate and determine the prevailing hourly wage and benefits rate paid in the
construction industry in this State. To determine the prevailing hourly wage and benefits
rate, the bureau shall:
A. Collect a set of data by conducting a survey of wages and benefits during the 2nd
and 3rd week of July of each year;
B. Collect a 2nd set of data through certified payroll submissions on state construction
of public works during the 2nd and 3rd week of July of each year from any state agency
that contracts for the construction of public works; and
C. Collect a 3rd set of data for the job classification under the federal Davis-Bacon
Act.
Survey data collected pursuant to paragraph A and certified payroll data collected pursuant
to paragraph B must be submitted to the bureau by the 2nd week of October. Each year,
labor unions shall submit the most recent collectively bargained rates to the bureau.
The bureau shall use the highest wage and benefits information of the 3 data sets collected
pursuant to paragraphs A, B and C to determine the prevailing hourly wage and benefits
rate. The bureau may also use wage and benefits information received from construction
trade associations in its determination of prevailing rates. In determining the prevailing
rate, the bureau may ascertain and consider the applicable wage and benefits rates
established by collective bargaining agreements, if any, and those rates that are paid
generally in the locality where the construction of the public works is to be performed. For
any classification, if that rate represents a decrease from the prevailing hourly wage and
benefits rate as published in the immediately preceding year, the bureau shall adjust the
rate to ensure that the decrease is not more than 15%.
The bureau shall ascertain and consider wage and benefits information received from
construction trade associations and labor unions that are paid generally in the locality where
the construction of the public works is to be performed in its determination of prevailing
rates.
For purposes of this subsection, "benefits" means health and welfare contributions, pension
or individual retirement account contributions and vacation and annuity contributions, per
diem in lieu of wages and any other form of payment, except for wages, made to or on
behalf of the employee. If a defined contribution amount is not established, the most
accurate estimated value of contributions must be included.
Page 3 - 132LR1752(05)

Sec. A-9. 30-A MRSA §4723, sub-§2, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 657, §14,
is amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) A commissioner with expertise in energy efficiency issues regarding
residential structures and in the construction sustainability requirements
established in section 4726, subsection 2; and
Sec. A-10. 35-A MRSA §3210-C, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2009, c. 518, §4, is
further amended to read:
6. Competitive solicitation process and contract negotiation. Except as provided
in paragraph A, for purposes of selecting potential capacity resources for contracting
pursuant to subsection 3, the commission shall may, after consultation with the
Commissioner of Energy Resources, conduct a competitive solicitation no less often than
every 3 years if the commission determines that the likely benefits to ratepayers resulting
from any contracts entered into as a result of the solicitation process will exceed the likely
costs. Following review of bids, the commission may negotiate with one or more potential
suppliers shall approve a contract or contracts between one or more transmission and
distribution utilities and the bidder of any proposal selected by the commission in
accordance with this section. When only one bid has been offered, the commission shall
ensure that negotiations are based on full project cost disclosure by the potential supplier.
The commission shall negotiate contracts that are commercially reasonable and that
commit all parties to commercially reasonable behavior.
A. The commission shall, for purposes of selecting energy efficiency capacity
resources and available energy associated with such resources for contracting pursuant
to subsection 3, conduct a competitive solicitation in accordance with this subsection
or contract with the Efficiency Maine Trust established in section 10103 to deliver
those resources through a competitive solicitation process administered by the trust.
Sec. A-11. 35-A MRSA §3401-A, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Department. "Department" means the Department of Energy Resources
established in chapter 103.
Sec. A-12. 35-A MRSA §3408, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 481, §6, is
amended to read:
2. Requests for proposals; offshore wind power projects. The commission shall
review a solicitation developed by the office department under subsection 1 and, upon
finding that the solicitation is reasonably likely to attract competitive bids and further the
objectives of the program as described in section 3407, shall authorize the department to
issue a request for proposals in accordance with this subsection.
A. The office shall file with the commission the first solicitation by July 1, 2025 unless
another date is established by mutual agreement between the office and the
commission.
B. The commission department shall issue the first request for proposals by the later
of January 15, 2026 and 3 months after the first auction by the federal Department of
the Interior, Bureau of Ocean Energy Management for offshore wind power leases in
the Gulf of Maine.
Page 4 - 132LR1752(05)

C. If, within any 3-year period between January 15, 2026 and January 1, 2039, the
commission has not found a solicitation submitted by the office department to be
reasonably likely to further the objectives of the program as described in section 3407,
the commission shall expeditiously develop and issue a request for proposals consistent
with the requirements of this section.
D. The commission shall review and make a determination regarding a solicitation
submitted by the office within 6 months 120 days of the date of submission unless a
longer period is requested by the department.
E. If the commission determines that a contract for an amount greater than those
specified in subsection 1, paragraph C is in the public interest, it may authorize the
department to select resources and the commission may approve contracts accordingly.
F. In conducting a solicitation and selecting offshore wind power projects under this
section, the commission department shall ensure that selected projects result in
contracts that are cost-effective for electric ratepayers over the term of the contract,
taking into consideration potential quantitative and qualitative economic,
environmental and other benefits to ratepayers.
The commission department shall give priority to offshore wind power projects that:
(1) Have generation facilities located outside of Lobster Management Area 1;
(2) Include agreements compliant with subsection 3 or 29 United States Code,
Section 158(f) and are open to disadvantaged business enterprises and small
businesses;
(3) Provide employment and contracting opportunities for:
(a) Members of federally recognized Indian tribes in this State;
(b) Workers from disadvantaged communities as defined by:
(i) The United States Council on Environmental Quality's climate and
economic justice screening tool or by an agency of this State using
standards similar to those in the screening tool as determined by the
commission;
(ii) The United States Department of Commerce, Economic Development
Administration's economic distress criteria; or
(iii) The United States Department of Energy's disadvantaged community
criteria; and
(c) Certified businesses;
(4) Provide community benefits, as determined preconstruction through
consultation with federally recognized Indian tribes in this State, a stakeholder
engagement process that includes disadvantaged communities, as described in
subparagraph (3), division (b), and investments in fishing communities;
(5) Provide financial contributions or technical assistance to support research,
monitoring and mitigation of impacts to wildlife, fisheries and habitats and the
minimization of environmental impacts from the offshore wind power project and
related transmission and interconnection infrastructure;
Page 5 - 132LR1752(05)

(6) Provide economic benefits to the State, including using an offshore wind port
located in this State;
(7) Maximize the hiring of residents of this State;
(8) Maximize economic, employment and contracting opportunities for residents
of this State and all businesses in this State; and
(9) Provide ratepayer benefits, including, but not limited to, enhanced electric
reliability, resource adequacy including contributing to reducing winter electricity
price spikes and overall price impacts, avoidance of line loss and mitigation of
transmission costs to the extent possible.
The commission shall allow the office to review the bids submitted pursuant to this
subsection. The office may provide input to the commission upon review of the bids,
which may include an assessment as to whether any bids submitted are consistent with
the goals of the program as described in section 3407, subsection 1.
G. The commission may direct one or more transmission and distribution utilities to
enter into long-term contracts for energy, capacity or renewable energy credits from
offshore wind power projects selected by the commission in accordance with this
subsection shall review and approve the contracts upon a finding that the contracts meet
the requirements of this section.
H. If, at the close of a competitive bidding process conducted under this section, the
commission department determines that the proposals submitted do not satisfy the
requirements of paragraph F, the commission department shall reject all proposals and
shall open a new competitive bidding process under this subsection.
I. Notwithstanding Title 5, section 8071, subsection 3, the commission department,
after consultation with the office commission, may establish by rule reasonable fees
that bidders must submit with proposals for offshore wind power projects. Fees
collected pursuant to this paragraph may be used for the administration of this section,
section 3406 and section 3407. Upon request of the office commission, the commission
department may transfer fees collected in accordance with this paragraph to the office
commission for the administration of this section, section 3406 and section 3407.
Sec. A-13. 35-A MRSA §3803, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 328, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. A-14. 35-A MRSA §3803, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 328, §1, is
amended to read:
3. Funding and reporting. Notwithstanding sections 116 and 117, at the request of
the office trust, the commission may transfer money from funds in the Public Utilities
Commission Regulatory Fund or the Public Utilities Commission Reimbursement Fund to
the office to pay for the costs associated with a petition for a procurement of energy from
renewable resources under subsection 1 and, at the request of the trust, to the trust to
implement the 3-year beneficial electrification plan included in the triennial plan under
subsection 2. At the end of any year in which the commission has transferred money under
this subsection to the office or the trust, the office or the trust, respectively, shall provide a
report to the commission detailing its fund requests, money received and expenditures.
Page 6 - 132LR1752(05)

Sec. A-15. 35-A MRSA §3804, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 328, §1, is amended to
read:
§3804. Commission advancement of clean energy and beneficial electrification
The commission shall advance through its decisions and orders beneficial
electrification in order to achieve the emission reduction and renewable energy goals of the
State, reduce energy costs to consumers and provide economic and climate benefits for all
ratepayers. The commission shall seek to procure energy under section 3803, subsection 1,
paragraph B in a manner that is consistent with beneficial electrification. To the extent
practicable, the commission shall seek to ensure that the acquisition of energy from
renewable resources under section 3803, subsection 1, paragraph B is designed to procure
sufficient energy to meet the portfolio requirements under section 3210 for the reasonably
expected increase in use of electricity by retail electricity consumers.
Sec. A-16. 35-A MRSA Pt. 9 is enacted to read:
PART 9
ENERGY RESOURCES
CHAPTER 103
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY RESOURCES
§10301. Department established
The Department of Energy Resources is established as a cabinet-level department.
§10302. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Commissioner. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Energy Resources.
2. Department. "Department" means the Department of Energy Resources.
§10303. Departmental responsibilities
The department has responsibilities relating to energy resources, planning, programs
and development. The department shall conduct planning, develop and implement policies
and establish programs designed to ensure all households, communities and businesses in
the State have access to an affordable, reliable and resilient energy supply to meet energy
demand, address energy burdens and support economic development while supporting the
achievement of the greenhouse gas reduction obligations and climate policies pursuant to
Title 38, section 576-A and section 577, subsection 1 and the renewable energy goals
established in section 3210, subsection 1-A. The department is designated as the energy
office for the State.
§10304. Commissioner
The department is under the control and supervision of the Commissioner of Energy
Resources, who reports directly to the Governor.
Page 7 - 132LR1752(05)

1. Appointment. The Governor shall appoint the commissioner, subject to review by
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters and
confirmation by the Senate. The commissioner serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
2. Deputy commissioner. The commissioner shall appoint a deputy commissioner to
assist the commissioner with the operations of the department. The deputy commissioner
serves at the pleasure of the commissioner.
3. Personnel. The commissioner may employ, subject to the Civil Service Law,
personnel for the department and prescribe the duties of these employees as the
commissioner determines necessary to fulfill the duties of the department. The
commissioner may delegate duties assigned to the commissioner under this chapter to
personnel of the department.
4. Commissioner; limitation. An individual serving or appointed to serve as the
commissioner on or after December 15, 2025 may not participate on behalf of a bidder in
the submission of a proposal in response to a competitive solicitation conducted by the
department pursuant to section 10313 until 12 months after the completion of the
commissioner's service.
5. Contracts; agreements. The department may employ experts and professional
consultants, contract for services as the commissioner determines necessary consistent with
the powers and duties of the department and enter into agreements with federal, state and
municipal entities and other organizations as will promote the objectives of this chapter.
6. Powers and duties of commissioner. The commissioner is responsible for the
execution of the duties of the department. The commissioner shall:
A. Advise the Governor and state agencies on matters related to energy;
B. Serve as a member of the Efficiency Maine Trust Board, established under Title 5,
section 12004‑G, subsection 10‑C;
C. In collaboration with the relevant state agencies, coordinate state energy policy and
actively foster cooperation with the Efficiency Maine Trust, established in chapter 97,
and the Maine State Housing Authority, established in Title 30-A, chapter 201; and
D. Represent the State's interests in relevant regional energy organizations and forums
to coordinate energy policy.
§10305. Powers and duties of department
Under the supervision of the commissioner, the department shall:
1. State energy plan. Prepare and submit a comprehensive state energy plan to the
Governor and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
energy matters by January 15th of each odd-numbered year. The department shall ensure
the state energy plan is informed by public input, including, but not limited to, through the
conduct of at least 2 public meetings and receipt of public comment related to a draft of the
state energy plan, and shall seek input regarding issues faced by socially vulnerable
counties and communities as defined in section 3210-I, subsection 1, paragraph D. The
state energy plan must:
A. Identify opportunities to lower and to maintain reasonable total energy costs for
consumers in the State;
Page 8 - 132LR1752(05)

B. Evaluate energy data, including, but not limited to, data on energy supply, demand
and costs in this State with consideration of all available energy sources;
C. Detail the State's progress toward meeting its energy goals for new renewable
energy generation and energy storage, including distributed energy resources;
D. Evaluate the State's progress in meeting the oil dependence reduction targets in
section 10309;
E. Identify resource and transmission and distribution capacity and infrastructure
needs to facilitate the development and integration of new renewable energy generation
within the State and support the State's renewable resource portfolio requirements
specified in section 3210 in close coordination with the independent system operator
of the New England bulk power system or a successor organization, the Public Utilities
Commission's integrated grid planning under section 3147 and transmission and
distribution utilities;
F. Address the association between energy planning and meeting the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals in the state climate action plan pursuant to Title 38, section
577;
G. Include a cost and resource estimate for technology development to meet the goals
and objectives of the state energy plan;
H. Include energy supply and demand forecasts that must be considered in other
planning efforts including updates to the state climate action plan under Title 38,
section 577 and the Efficiency Maine Trust's triennial plan under section 10104,
subsection 4; and
I. Identify approximate total project award targets for the next 3 competitive
solicitations to be conducted by the department pursuant to section 10313.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters
may report out legislation by April 1st of each odd-numbered year relating to the content
of the state energy plan. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over natural resources matters may make recommendations regarding that legislation to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters;
2. Recommendations. Make recommendations, if needed, for additional legislative
and administrative actions to ensure that the State can meet the goals and objectives of the
state energy plan under subsection 1. The department shall develop, recommend and, as
appropriate, take action to implement integrated or comprehensive strategies, including at
regional and federal levels, to carry out the goals and objectives of the state energy plan, to
secure the State's interest in energy resources and the supply and cost-effective use of those
resources and lower the total cost of energy to consumers in this State;
3. Annual report. By January 15th of each year, prepare and submit to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters a report that
describes the activities of the department during the previous calendar year in carrying out
its duties under this section and describes the State's progress in implementation of the state
energy plan prepared pursuant to subsection 1, funding received from private sources
pursuant to section 10308, subsection 3 and the department's annual accounting pursuant
to section 10308, subsection 2. After receipt and review of the annual report, the joint
standing committee may report out legislation relating to energy policy;
Page 9 - 132LR1752(05)

4. Energy data collection and analysis. In collaboration with other relevant state
agencies, private industry and nonprofit organizations, collect and analyze energy data,
including, but not limited to, data on energy supply, demand and costs in this State with
consideration of all available energy sources;
5. Energy information dissemination. Review and coordinate the dissemination of
energy information developed by cabinet-level state agencies intended for the public and
the media;
6. Technical assistance. Provide technical assistance and information to the Governor
and the Legislature regarding the State's short-range and long-range energy needs and the
resources to meet those needs;
7. Funds from public and private sources. Seek, accept and administer funds from
public and private sources and develop partnerships with public and private entities to
support the goals of the department, including, but not limited to, promoting energy
efficiency, demand-side management and distributed generation;
8. Federal government funds. Receive and administer funds from the United States
Department of Energy's State Energy Program and other federal funds as appropriate;
9. Electricity agreements. Work with transmission and distribution utilities, the
commission, state agencies involved in the permitting of energy generation facilities and
other relevant entities to negotiate agreements that create value for electricity consumers
with developers of renewable generation who are interested in building energy generation
facilities or developing or using energy transmission infrastructure in this State. This
subsection may not be interpreted to authorize the commissioner to be a signatory to such
agreements unless otherwise authorized by law;
10. Energy transmission capacity planning and policy. Monitor energy
transmission capacity planning and policy affecting this State and make recommendations
to the Governor and the Legislature as necessary for changes to the relevant laws and rules
to facilitate energy infrastructure planning and development;
11. Petroleum products. Monitor petroleum product inventories, deliveries,
curtailments and shortfalls and other matters relating to the availability of petroleum
products in the State;
12. State energy security plan. Prepare and submit a state energy security plan in
accordance with federal requirements. The department shall, to the extent practicable while
protecting the energy security of the State, also submit the plan to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters;
13. Clean energy program. Establish and manage a program to promote clean energy
job development and clean technology business innovation in coordination with industry,
educational and training organizations to support current and future workforce needs,
including access to high-quality employment opportunities for residents of the State that
contribute to the development of a skilled and trained workforce;
14. Beneficial electrification. Coordinate with the commission and the Efficiency
Maine Trust, established in section 10103, to monitor beneficial electrification trends and
opportunities and to establish beneficial electrification targets and regulatory frameworks;
Page 10 - 132LR1752(05)

15. Renewable resource portfolio requirements. Review and report on the status
and impacts of the implementation of the renewable resource portfolio requirements as
described in section 3210; and
16. Greenhouse energy reductions. Ensure that the State's energy goals, policies and
plans align with and support the achievement of the greenhouse gas reduction obligations
and climate policies established by Title 38, sections 576-A and 577.
§10306. Coordination; advice to state agencies
The department shall advise state agencies regarding energy-related principles for
agencies to consider, along with the laws and policies governing those agencies, in:
1. State-owned land and assets. The sale, lease or other allowance for use of state-
owned land or assets for the purpose of development of energy infrastructure;
2. Revenue obligation securities. The issuance of revenue obligation securities for
energy facilities pursuant to Title 10, section 1044;
3. State facility energy programs. Energy programs at state facilities and operations
to improve energy efficiency, greenhouse gas emissions reduction and demand
management; and
4. Energy program administration. The administration of state-funded and federally
funded energy programs to support:
A. The federal low-income home energy assistance program that provides heating
assistance to eligible low-income persons and any state-funded or privately funded
heating assistance program of a similar nature assigned to the department for
administration; and
B. The federal weatherization assistance program that offers home weatherization
grants and heating system upgrades to eligible low-income persons.
The department shall coordinate with the Department of Environmental Protection and
the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future, established in Title 5, section 3102, on
matters related to climate mitigation, greenhouse gas reduction strategies and adaptation
policies.
This section does not alter any of the responsibilities or limit any of the authority of the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services pursuant
to Title 5. This section does not alter or limit the ability of departments or agencies of the
State, along with the Bureau of General Services pursuant to Title 5, to generate or
cogenerate energy at state facilities for use on site and elsewhere.
§10307. Rulemaking
The department may adopt rules the commissioner determines necessary for the proper
implementation of this chapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A, unless otherwise specified.
§10308. Funding
In addition to funds provided from the General Fund or other available resources, the
department is funded in accordance with this section.
Page 11 - 132LR1752(05)

1. Federal funds. The department is funded by federal funds that are available to and
received by the department. Such federal funds may be applied to support the personal
services and all other costs of the department.
2. Efficiency Maine Trust funding. To the extent federal funds under subsection 1
are inadequate to meet the funding needs of the department, the department may receive
funds from the Efficiency Maine Trust, established in chapter 97, but only for that portion
of the department's activities that supports or reasonably relates to programs or activities
of the Efficiency Maine Trust. The commissioner shall keep an accounting of the
department's resources devoted to its various duties and activities, including that portion of
its resources devoted to activities in support of or reasonably related to programs or
activities of the Efficiency Maine Trust. The department shall provide the accounting to
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters as
part of its annual report under section 10305, subsection 3. The joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters shall make recommendations to
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and
financial affairs with regard to any proposed allocation of Efficiency Maine Trust funds to
support the department. In accordance with any legislative allocation or deallocation of
Efficiency Maine Trust funds to support the department, the commissioner shall request
from the Efficiency Maine Trust and the trust shall provide the allocated resources to the
department.
3. Acceptance and administration of funds. The department may accept, administer
and expend funds, including, but not limited to, funds from the Federal Government or
from private sources, for purposes consistent with this chapter. The commissioner shall
provide a report of the amount of any outside funding received from private sources and its
designated purpose to the Governor and the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over energy matters in accordance with section 10305, subsection 3.
§10309. Oil dependence reduction plan
The department, with input from stakeholders and in consultation with the Efficiency
Maine Trust, established in chapter 97, shall develop a plan to reduce the use of oil in all
sectors of the economy in this State. The plan must:
1. Targets. Be designed to achieve the targets of reducing the State's consumption of
oil by at least 30% from 2007 levels by 2030 and by at least 50% from 2007 levels by 2050;
2. Policies and infrastructure changes. Focus on near-term policies and
infrastructure changes that set the State on a reasonable trajectory to meet the 2030 and
2050 targets in subsection 1;
3. Priorities. Prioritize the improvement of energy efficiency and the transition to the
use of alternative energy sources for heating and transportation; and
4. Data and analyses. Draw on existing state data and studies rather than new
analyses, including, but not limited to, analyses and data from the state climate action plan
pursuant to Title 38, section 577 and the progress updates to the climate action plan under
Title 38, section 578; the state energy plan pursuant to section 10305, subsection 1; and the
Efficiency Maine Trust's triennial plan pursuant to section 10104, subsection 4 and analyses
completed by the Federal Government, nonprofit organizations and other stakeholders.
§10310. Maine Energy Resources Development Program
Page 12 - 132LR1752(05)

The Maine Energy Resources Development Program, referred to in this section as "the
program," is established to promote energy research and demonstration activities related to
the use of indigenous, renewable resources and more efficient use of energy. The
department, as funding allows, shall administer the program. The commissioner may accept
funds from private sources for the purpose of funding the program.
1. Report. The commissioner shall include in the state energy plan under section
10305, subsection 1 a report that specifies, in regard to the program, the expenditure of
program funds, the purposes for which the funds were used and the amount of the funds
and the sources from which the funds were derived.
2. Program expenditures. For all proposed program expenditures of $10,000 or
more, the commissioner shall seek approval from the Governor. If the Governor approves,
the commissioner shall seek approval for those expenditures from the Legislature under the
procedures authorizing the transfer of funds set forth in Title 5, section 1585.
§10311. Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program
The Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program is established to provide funding
to foster the continued growth of cost-effective distributed solar facilities and energy
storage systems in this State. The department, as funding allows, shall develop the
program.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings.
A. "Combined project" means a distributed solar facility that is paired with an energy
storage system.
B. "Distributed solar facility" means a solar generating facility interconnected to a
transmission and distribution utility as defined in section 102, subsection 20‑B.
C. "Energy storage system" has the same meaning as in section 3481, subsection 6.
D. "Program" means the Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program established in
this section.
2. Program development. The program must be designed to obtain and provide
available federal funds to support cost-effective distributed solar facilities and energy
storage systems. The department shall consult with the commission in developing and
administering the program.
3. Funding. In order to support the department's activities in administering the
program, the department may request funds from the commission for the department's
administrative costs, which may include, but are not limited to, costs associated with hiring
consultants and department personnel and contracting for technical analyses.
Notwithstanding section 117, if the department requests funding in accordance with this
subsection, the commission may provide funding, to the extent available, from the Public
Utilities Commission Reimbursement Fund under section 117. If the Public Utilities
Commission Reimbursement Fund does not have sufficient funding, notwithstanding
section 116, subsection 4, the commission may provide funding from the Public Utilities
Commission Regulatory Fund in accordance with this subsection.
4. Federal funds. The department shall apply for available federal funds to fund the
program, including, but not limited to, funds from the United States Environmental
Page 13 - 132LR1752(05)

Protection Agency's greenhouse gas reduction fund under 42 United States Code, Section
7434. Nothing in this subsection limits other uses of federal funds received by the
department consistent with applicable federal requirements.
5. Ratepayer funds. Except as provided in subsections 3 and 6, ratepayer funds may
not be used to implement the program or to provide funding under the program to
distributed solar facilities or energy storage systems.
6. Energy procurement. The department may procure energy, capacity or renewable
energy credits in accordance with section 10313, subsection 2 from distributed solar
facilities or combined projects that receive federal funding pursuant to the program. The
commission may not direct a transmission and distribution utility to enter into a long-term
contract for energy, capacity or renewable energy credits from a distributed solar facility
or a combined project unless the commission finds that the contract will benefit ratepayers
and the procurement is in accordance with section 10313.
§10312. Reporting of petroleum product inventories and deliveries
The following provisions govern the reporting of petroleum product inventories and
deliveries.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Petroleum product" means propane; gasoline; unleaded gasoline; gasohol;
kerosene; #2 heating oil; diesel fuel; kerosene-based jet fuel; aviation gasoline; #4, #5
and #6 residual oil for utility and nonutility uses; and Bunker C oil.
B. "Primary storage facility" means a facility that receives petroleum products into the
State by pipeline or by ship.
C. "Primary supplier" means a refiner, marketer, distributor, firm or person who makes
the first sale of any petroleum product to resellers or consumers in this State.
2. Primary storage facility inventory and delivery reporting. On the first and 3rd
Monday of each month, an owner or lessee of a primary storage facility in the State shall
make an accurate report to the department of petroleum product inventories and deliveries
on a form provided by the commissioner. The form must contain a conspicuous statement
of the penalties provided in subsection 4 and must require, with regard to the owner's or
lessee's primary storage facility, the following information:
A. The total inventory of each petroleum product stored in the State, as measured
within not more than 3 working days prior to the reporting date; and
B. The quantities of each petroleum product delivery expected into the State within 15
days of the reporting date or within any longer period established by the commissioner.
3. Primary supplier petroleum product delivery reporting. On the 3rd Monday of
each month, a primary supplier of petroleum products shall make an accurate report to the
department of actual and anticipated deliveries on a form provided by the commissioner,
unless the report is already being submitted in accordance with federal regulations. The
form must contain a conspicuous statement of the penalties provided in subsection 4 and
must require the following information:
Page 14 - 132LR1752(05)

A. Actual deliveries of all petroleum products in this State during the preceding
calendar month;
B. Anticipated deliveries of all petroleum products in this State during the following
calendar month or during any longer period established by the commissioner; and
C. Allocation fractions for all petroleum products for the following month or for any
longer period established by the commissioner.
4. Violations. An owner or lessee of a primary storage facility or a primary supplier
who fails to provide the information required by this section or who supplies false or
misleading information commits a civil violation for which a fine of $2,500 may be
adjudged.
5. Department reports. If the department determines, based on available information,
that there is or may be a significant shortfall in supply inventories or anticipated deliveries
into the State of home heating oil or kerosene, the department shall provide a report to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters
including:
A. The information that suggests a supply shortfall;
B. Current and anticipated inventories of home heating oil and kerosene storage
supplies;
C. Any recommendations of the department for actions by the State in response to the
anticipated supply shortfall; and
D. A report on inventories, deliveries, curtailments, shortfalls or other matters relating
to the availability of petroleum products in this State, at the request of the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters.
§10313. Competitive solicitations
The department is responsible for initiating and conducting procurements for energy,
associated environmental attributes or other services from renewable and clean resources.
For the purposes of this section, "renewable and clean resources" means generation eligible
for any portfolio requirement in section 3210, energy storage, demand management or
related transmission. Beginning January 15, 2027, and every 2 years thereafter, the
department shall conduct one or more competitive solicitations during the following 2-year
period to procure renewable and clean resources, which may include environmental
attributes through long-term contracts if the department determines procurement is
necessary to achieve the requirements of Title 38, section 576-A or 577 or Title 35-A,
section 3210, to meet and manage reasonably expected growth in electricity demand or to
meet reliability needs or the department determines is otherwise necessary based on the
comprehensive state energy plan prepared pursuant to section 10305, subsection 1. These
contracts are not subject to the rules of the Chief Procurement Officer.
1. Objectives. The department shall conduct competitive solicitation under this
section in a manner consistent with the following objectives:
A. To provide the benefits of renewable and clean resources to ratepayers in the State;
Page 15 - 132LR1752(05)

B. To provide the benefits of renewable and clean resources toward meeting the
greenhouse gas reduction obligations and climate policies established by Title 38,
sections 576-A and 577;
C. To contribute to the State's economic and workforce goals, including through the
actions detailed in section 3210-I, subsection 3, paragraph D, subparagraph (2);
D. To minimize the impact of energy generation on the environment of the State;
E. To ensure the protection of low-income ratepayers; and
F. To avoid or minimize the curtailment of other renewable or clean resources.
2. Solicitation initiation. If the department determines one or more competitive
solicitations are necessary based on the comprehensive state energy plan required pursuant
to section 10305, subsection 1 and related analysis, the department shall initiate
solicitations in order to select resources for contracts under this section. The department
shall determine the total amount sought in all competitive solicitations within any 2-year
period under this section in accordance with the state energy plan, except that the amount
may not exceed 15% of the average annual statewide electric retail sales in the preceding
2-year period.
A. The department shall develop a request for proposals for each competitive
solicitation that meets the requirements of subsection 3.
B. The department shall consult with the Office of the Public Advocate in developing
a request for proposals. The department may also solicit public input, including
through requests for information, to obtain information prior to publishing any final
competitive solicitation.
C. The department shall submit a request for proposals to the commission for approval
prior to its issuance. The commission shall approve or reject a request for proposals
submitted by the department in accordance with this section as expeditiously as
possible but within 120 calendar days, unless a longer period is requested by the
department. The commission shall approve a request for proposals upon finding that
it conforms to the requirements of subsection 3, is reasonably likely to result in one or
more contracts that provide benefits to ratepayers in the State in excess of any costs to
ratepayers as a result of the contract and is reasonably likely to result in competitive
bids.
D. The department may hire expert consultants necessary to assist in the development
of the competitive solicitation and evaluation of proposals.
E. The department may coordinate a competitive solicitation with other governmental
entities or entities designated by those jurisdictions or transmission and distribution
utilities.
3. Solicitation requirements. A competitive solicitation under this section must be
conducted using a request for proposals. A request for proposals must include, but is not
limited to:
A. Criteria to determine the eligibility of prospective bidders;
B. Criteria to determine the eligibility of submitted projects;
Page 16 - 132LR1752(05)

C. Criteria to determine the selection of awarded projects, including criteria to
determine ratepayer benefits and costs consistent with subsection 1;
D. A process for the submission of questions by prospective bidders and the provisions
of responses by the department in a manner that is equally accessible to all prospective
bidders;
E. A timeline with expected dates for each phase of the bidding and evaluation process;
F. A standard form contract, which must include commercially reasonable terms and
terms that to the extent practicable avoid or minimize the curtailment of other
renewable or clean resources and protect ratepayers from impacts of negative pricing,
and may not be for a term greater than 20 years, unless a different term is determined
by the commission to be in the public interest;
G. Notice of state wage, safety and apprenticeship requirements that may be required
based on the solicitation type; and
H. Any necessary materials or templates to enable submission of comparable and
competitive bids.
4. Evaluation and selection. The department shall evaluate and select proposals in
accordance with this subsection. The department may coordinate with other entities,
including, but not limited to, state agencies, the Office of the Public Advocate, transmission
and distribution utilities, other states and the independent system operator of the New
England bulk power system or a successor organization, in the evaluation and selection of
proposals under this section. The department may find a submitted proposal ineligible if
the department, at its sole discretion, determines the proposal does not conform to the
criteria established in the request for proposals.
A. In evaluating eligible proposals and selecting one or more proposals for contract
awards, the department shall give the greatest weight to the benefits to ratepayers. The
department may not select a proposal for a contract award unless the department
determines the proposal is reasonably likely to provide benefits to ratepayers in the
State in excess of any costs to ratepayers as a result of the contract.
B. In selecting projects that meet the requirements of paragraph A, the department
shall also weigh factors consistent with the objectives established in subsection 1, as
long as the factors and weight are consistent with the criteria established pursuant to
subsection 3, paragraph C.
C. The department shall evaluate and to the extent practicable, select proposals that
avoid or minimize negative impact on other renewable or clean generation due to
congestion and curtailment.
5. Wage, safety and apprenticeship standards. If the department selects a project
for a contract for energy from an assisted project located in the State as defined in Title 26,
section 1304, subsection 1-A, the department shall ensure that standards under the contract
applicable to contractors and subcontractors involved in the project's construction include
requirements that a contractor or subcontractor:
A. Ensure that all construction workers earn compensation at or above the prevailing
hourly wage as described in Title 26, section 1308; and
B. Meet the requirements described in Title 26, sections 1301, 1317 and 3502.
Page 17 - 132LR1752(05)

6. Contracts. Contracts must be based on the standard form contract required by
subsection 3, paragraph F. The department may coordinate with any entity listed in
subsection 4 in the negotiation of contracts. The department or a transmission and
distribution utility may make a request to file information relevant to the contract
negotiations with the commission pursuant to a protective order.
7. Commission approval. The department shall submit contracts negotiated pursuant
to subsection 6 to the commission for approval, and the commission shall approve a
contract upon finding that:
A. The solicitation process conducted by the department conformed to the
requirements of this section;
B. The contract is commercially reasonable; and
C. The contract is reasonably likely to provide benefits to ratepayers in the State in
excess of any costs to ratepayers as a result of the contract, as determined using the
criteria established pursuant to subsection 3, paragraph C.
If the commission approves a contract, the commission shall issue an order directing a
transmission and distribution utility to act with respect to the contract within 120 calendar
days, unless a longer period is requested by the department. If the commission does not
approve a contract, the commission may direct that the contract be amended and
resubmitted to the commission for approval.
8. Bidding fees. The department may require a bidder to pay a reasonable and
nonrefundable bidding fee to defray the department's administrative costs associated with
a solicitation, as well as financial security due at contract execution, which may be at risk
if projects fail to meet project milestones. The department may require a transmission and
distribution utility to hold those fees. A bidding fee must be set forth in the request for
proposals required by subsection 2.
9. Confidentiality. Proposals submitted in response to a solicitation and materials
created or submitted during contract negotiations pursuant to this section are confidential
and may not be disclosed.
10. Commission rules. The commission shall establish a process by rule for the
review of requests for proposals under section 2, paragraph C and the review of contracts
under subsection 7. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules
as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. A-17. 38 MRSA §579, first ¶, as repealed and replaced by PL 2013, c. 588,
Pt. A, §49, is amended to read:
The department may participate in the regional greenhouse gas initiative under chapter
3‑B. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee and the members of the Public
Utilities Commission Commissioner of Energy Resources or the commissioner's designee
are authorized to act as representatives for the State in the regional organization as defined
in section 580‑A, subsection 20, may contract with organizations and entities when such
arrangements are necessary to efficiently carry out the purposes of this section and may
coordinate the State's efforts with other states and jurisdictions participating in that
initiative, with respect to:
Page 18 - 132LR1752(05)

Sec. A-18. Initial procurement. Notwithstanding the requirement established in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 10313 requiring the Department of Energy
Resources to initiate and conduct a competitive procurement for renewable and clean
resources beginning January 15, 2027, the department shall initiate and conduct that same
competitive procurement pursuant to the requirements of Title 35-A, section 10313 no later
than January 15, 2026.
Sec. A-19. Transition provision. The at-large members of the Finance Authority
of Maine serving on the effective date of this Act continue as members of the Finance
Authority of Maine until the expiration of their terms under the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 10, section 966, subsection 1.
Sec. A-20. Wage and benefit report. By January 15, 2026, the Department of
Labor shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Labor that includes
information detailing the process and progress to date of how the Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Standards is using the wage and benefits information received from
construction trade associations and labor unions in its determination of prevailing rates
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 1308, subsection 1. The joint
standing committee may report out a bill based on the report to the Second Regular Session
of the 132nd Legislature.
PART B
Sec. B-1. Legislation; schedule. The Department of Energy Resources shall work
with staff from the Office of Policy and Legal Analysis and the Office of the Revisor of
Statutes to review those parts of the Maine Revised Statutes governing the administration
and activities of the Governor's Energy Office. The purpose of the review is to develop
legislation to effect the transition of responsibilities from the Governor's Energy Office to
the Department of Energy Resources as established in this Act and to correct any errors
and inconsistencies in the law that result from this Act. By January 1, 2026, the Department
of Energy Resources shall submit the legislation developed pursuant to this section to the
Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. B-2. Transition provisions, Governor's Energy Office. The following
provisions govern the transition of the Governor's Energy Office within the Executive
Department to the Department of Energy Resources.
1. The Department of Energy Resources is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Governor's Energy Office.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in
or by the Governor's Energy Office or any of its administrative units or officers are hereby
declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the
Department of Energy Resources.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the Governor's
Energy Office continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Governor's Energy Office become, on the effective date of this Part, the property of
the Department of Energy Resources.
Page 19 - 132LR1752(05)

5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Governor's Energy Office may be used by the Department of Energy
Resources until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances related to the coastal zone management program
remaining in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Department of Marine
Resources, Other Special Revenue Funds and federal funds to the Department of Energy
Resources no later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. B-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENERGY RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers 3 Public Service Coordinator II positions from the Governor's Energy
Office program, Federal Expenditures Fund within the Executive Department to the
Department of Energy Resources program, Federal Expenditures Fund within the
Department of Energy Resources and related All Other costs. All transferred positions,
including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Department of Energy
Resources. The designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is
based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation
and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $434,773 $470,139
All Other $15,995 $16,336
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $450,768 $486,475
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers 2 Public Service Coordinator II positions from the Governor's Energy
Office program within the Executive Department to the Department of Energy Resources
program within the Department of Energy Resources and related All Other costs. All
transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the
Department of Energy Resources. The designation of each position as either confidential
or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain
their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $285,681 $308,620
All Other $11,012 $11,228
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $296,693 $319,848
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position from the
Governor's Energy Office program within the Executive Department to the Department of
Page 20 - 132LR1752(05)

Energy Resources program within the Department of Energy Resources and related All
Other costs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified
positions at the Department of Energy Resources. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $149,092 $29,856
All Other $15,118 $3,322
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $164,210 $33,178
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers 14 positions and all Personal Services and All Other funding from the
Governor's Energy Office program within the Executive Department to the Department of
Energy Resources program within the Department of Energy Resources within the same
fund. All transferred positions, with the exception of the reorganized Commissioner and
Deputy Commissioner, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at
the Department of Energy Resources. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances. Position details are on
file with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $801,731 $854,282
All Other $1,659,418 $1,659,418
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,461,149 $2,513,700
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,440,429 $1,521,531
All Other $3,240,473 $3,240,473
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,680,902 $4,762,004
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $20,356 $21,185
All Other $397,824 $402,515
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $418,180 $423,700
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers new All Other funding from the Governor's Energy Office program,
Federal Expenditures Fund within the Executive Department to the Department of Energy
Page 21 - 132LR1752(05)

Resources program, Federal Expenditures Fund within the Department of Energy
Resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,028,590 $12,028,590
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,028,590 $12,028,590
ENERGY RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $2,461,149 $2,513,700
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $17,621,163 $17,630,095
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $418,180 $423,700
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $20,500,492 $20,567,495
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Transfers new All Other funding from the Governor's Energy Office program,
Federal Expenditures Fund within the Executive Department to the Department of Energy
Resources program, Federal Expenditures Fund within the Department of Energy
Resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($12,028,590) ($12,028,590)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($12,028,590) ($12,028,590)
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Transfers 3 Public Service Coordinator II positions from the Governor's Energy
Office program, Federal Expenditures Fund within the Executive Department to the
Department of Energy Resources program, Federal Expenditures Fund within the
Department of Energy Resources and related All Other costs. All transferred positions,
including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Department of Energy
Resources. The designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is
based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation
and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (3.000) (3.000)
Personal Services ($434,773) ($470,139)
All Other ($15,995) ($16,336)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($450,768) ($486,475)
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Transfers 2 Public Service Coordinator II positions from the Governor's Energy
Office program within the Executive Department to the Department of Energy Resources
Page 22 - 132LR1752(05)

program within the Department of Energy Resources and related All Other costs. All
transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the
Department of Energy Resources. The designation of each position as either confidential
or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain
their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
Personal Services ($285,681) ($308,620)
All Other ($11,012) ($11,228)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($296,693) ($319,848)
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position from the
Governor's Energy Office program within the Executive Department to the Department of
Energy Resources program within the Department of Energy Resources and related All
Other costs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified
positions at the Department of Energy Resources. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($149,092) ($29,856)
All Other ($15,118) ($3,322)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($164,210) ($33,178)
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Transfers 14 positions and all Personal Services and All Other funding from the
Governor's Energy Office program within the Executive Department to the Department of
Energy Resources program within the Department of Energy Resources within the same
fund. All transferred positions, with the exception of the reorganized Commissioner and
Deputy Commissioner, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at
the Department of Energy Resources. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances. Position details are on file
with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (5.000) (5.000)
Personal Services ($801,731) ($854,282)
All Other ($1,659,418) ($1,659,418)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,461,149) ($2,513,700)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (8.000) (8.000)
Personal Services ($1,440,429) ($1,521,531)
Page 23 - 132LR1752(05)

All Other ($3,240,473) ($3,240,473)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($4,680,902) ($4,762,004)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($20,356) ($21,185)
All Other ($397,824) ($402,515)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($418,180) ($423,700)
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($2,461,149) ($2,513,700)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($17,621,163) ($17,630,095)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($418,180) ($423,700)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($20,500,492) ($20,567,495)
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $0
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
Page 24 - 132LR1752(05)